Arkansas, session 2025, HB1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 6-82-2002 through 6-82-2005 are amended to
read as follows:
6-82-2002. Planning Implementation grants — Definition.
(a) As used in this subchapter, a “planning grant” is a grant awarded
by the Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board to eligible
entities and individuals under this subchapter.
(b) The board Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board
shall:
(1) Allocate funds appropriated for purposes of this subchapter;
(2) Award a one-time planning implementation grant under this
section to an in-state based entity in this state that:
(A) Is in the process of creating a new graduate medical
education program; or
(B) Is expanding an existing graduate medical education
program;
(3) Award planning implementation grants on a competitive basis
*CRH077*
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
according to the criteria adopted by the board under its rules to include
without limitation consideration of the following:
(A) Development of a new or expanded program with a
specialty defined in the rules;
(B) Increasing positions for medical specialties having a
shortage within the state; and
(C) Increasing graduate medical education positions in
medically underserved areas in the state; and
(4) Determine the number of planning implementation grants
awarded and the amount of each planning implementation grant; and
(5) Determine the annual amount of grant award and the total
amount of grant award to be provided over the implementation period of the
new or expanding program.
(c)(1) An application for a planning grant under this section shall be
submitted by an entity to the board no later than July 15 of the year
preceding the year for which the planning grant will be used.
(2) The board shall award a planning grant to an eligible entity
under this section no later than August 15 of the year in which the eligible
entity's application was submitted.
(d) An entity that is awarded a planning grant under this section and
establishes additional first-year residency positions after the receipt of a
planning grant is eligible for additional funds for each position
established.

6-82-2003. Planning Implementation grants for program expansion or new
programs.
(a) The Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board shall
award planning implementation grants to enable entities with existing
graduate medical education programs to:
(1) Increase the number of first-year residency or fellowship
positions in existing graduate medical education programs; and
(2) Provide for the establishment of new graduate medical
education programs with first-year residency positions.
(b) The board shall determine the number of planning grants awarded
under this section and the amount of each planning grant awarded under this
section.
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
(c) A planning An implementation grant under this section shall be
used to support the direct resident start-up costs to the graduate medical
education program, including without limitation stipends and benefits at the
board's discretion.
(d)(c) An entity applying for a planning an implementation grant under
this section shall:
(1) Include submit a plan for receiving accreditation for the
increased number of residency positions or for the new graduate medical
education program, as applicable, that shall include without limitation:
(1) A timeline;
(2) A budget;
(3) A proposed program;
(4) The number of existing slots within a proposed program
expansion;
(5) Letters of support from both the sponsoring institution and
clinical site;
(6) The number of current residency slots available; and
(7) The number of new residency slots that will be established
in a new program.; and
(2) Be submitted to the board no later than October 1 preceding
the academic year for which the planning grant is made.
(e)(d) The board shall:
(1) Award a planning grant award an implementation grant under
this section no later than January 1 of the year in which the planning grant
will be used in the fourth calendar quarter on an annual basis as funding is
available; and
(2) Distribute a planning grant amount for a residency position
under this section only upon receiving verification that the applicable
residency position has been filled.
(f)(1)(e) A planning An implementation grant awarded under this
section shall be in effect for no more than three (3) consecutive fiscal
years the number of years of the program plus two (2) years for
implementation and accreditation before enrolling a resident or fellow.
(2) For each first-year residency position for which an entity
with a graduate medical education program receives an initial planning grant
under this section, the board shall award the entity with the graduate
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
medical education program an equal planning grant amount for the following
fiscal year, not to exceed three (3) fiscal years.
(f) An entity awarded an implementation grant under this section shall
provide a progress report to the board before the distribution of grant funds
for the following year.

6-82-2004. Priority of planning implementation grants — Adjustment of
amounts.
(a) If the Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board
determines that the number of first-year residency positions proposed by
eligible applicants under § 6-82-2003 exceeds the amount of funding
appropriated for the planning implementation grants under this subchapter,
the board:
(1) May give priority for up to fifty percent (50%) of the
funded first-year residency positions implementation grant awards to be in:
(A) Primary care; or
(B) A field in which this state has less than eighty
percent (80%) of the national average of physicians per one hundred thousand
(100,000) people, as determined by the board based on the Association of
American Medical Colleges State Physician Workforce Data Report there is a
shortage in the state as determined by the board; or
(C) A new program or a program expansion that:
(i) Has the earliest start date; or
(ii) Will expand the cap of an Arkansas hospital;
and
(2) Shall not reduce planning grant amounts awarded for each
resident position, but may proportionately reduce the number of positions
funded for each graduate medical education program.
(b) If the board determines that, based on the applications it has
received for planning grants under § 6-82-2003, the entire appropriation for
planning grants under this subchapter shall not be awarded for a particular
year, the board may transfer and use the funds appropriated to award planning
grants under § 6-82-2002.

6-82-2005. Planning grants for additional years of residency.
(a) If the Graduate Medical Education Residency Expansion Board
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
determines that funds appropriated under this subchapter are available after
all eligible planning grant applications under §§ 6-82-2002 and 6-82-2003
have been funded, the board shall award planning grants from excess funds to
support medical residents who:
(1) Have completed at least three (3) years of residency; and
(2) Are enrolled in a residency program in a field in which this
state has less than eighty percent (80%) of the national average of
physicians per one hundred thousand (100,000) people, as determined by the
board.
(b) The board shall determine the following with respect to planning
grants under this section:
(1) The amount of a planning grant awarded under this section;
(2) The number of planning grants awarded under this section;
and
(3) The residency fields in which recipients of planning grants
under this section work.
(c) A planning grant under this section shall be used to support the
direct resident costs to the graduate medical education program, including
without limitation stipends and benefits.
(d) The board shall distribute a planning grant amount for a residency
position under this section only upon receiving verification that the
applicable residency position has been filled.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 82, Subchapter 20, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-82-2006. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education” means
the private, not-for-profit organization that oversees the accreditation of
residency and fellowship programs for physicians in the United States;
(2) “Entity” means an:
(A) Arkansas hospital or medical facility that seeks to
provide medical residency opportunities; and
(B) Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education
sponsoring institution;
(3) “First-year residency position” means a position during the
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
first year of residency occurring after medical school graduation;
(4) “Fiscal year” means the fiscal year of the state for the
conduct of its financial affairs commencing on July 1 and ending on June 30 of
the following year;
(5) “Graduate medical education program” means the period of
education in a particular specialty or residency or subspecialty or
fellowship following medical school;
(6) “Implementation grant” means a grant awarded by the Graduate
Medical Education Residency Expansion Board to eligible entities and
individuals under this subchapter;
(7)(A) "Implementation period" means the amount of time in years
to establish a new program or expanded slots for a program.
(B) "Implementation period" includes the number of years
required for a resident or fellow to complete the program plus up to two (2)
years of start-up costs before enrolling the first resident or fellow.
(8)(A) “Primary care” includes without limitation the following:
(i) Internal medicine;
(ii) Pediatrics;
(iii) Family medicine;
(iv) Obstetrics and gynecology;
(v) General Surgery; and
(vi) Psychiatry.
(B) "Primary care" also includes without limitation the
transitional year;
(9) “Resident” means an individual enrolled in an Accreditation
Council for Graduate Medical Education-accredited residency program;
(10)(A) “Residency program" means a structured educational
activity comprising a series of clinical or other learning experiences in
graduate medical education designed to prepare a physician to enter the
unsupervised practice of medicine in a primary specialty.
(B) "Residency program" includes a program available for
physician admission:
(i) Immediately upon graduation from a medical
school or a college of osteopathic medicine as described in the institutional
requirements of the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education; and
(ii) After completion of prerequisite clinical
02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1384
education and training as described in the relevant specialty-specific
program requirements;
(11) “Specialty” means a field of medical practice that focuses
on a specific set of patient care skills;
(12) “Sponsoring institution” means an entity that oversees,
supports, and administers one (1) or more Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education-accredited residency or fellowship programs; and
(13) "Start-up costs" means a cost associated with program
planning, Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education application
preparation and submission, and other preliminary activities before a
resident is present in the program.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a great need for
medical professionals throughout the state to serve residents; that summer
deadlines are quickly approaching for programs that train new medical
professionals and funding needs to be distributed as soon as possible to
prepare these programs to begin training in the fall; and that this act is
immediately necessary because having trained medical professionals to fill
worker shortages throughout the state is vital to ensuring the health and
safety of Arkansans. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/L. Johnson





02-10-2025 10:01:30 CRH077